Massachusetts, session 194th, H1744.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “tenement house workrooms,” 
the following words:- seafood packing or processing facilities, 
SECTION 2. Section 56 of said chapter 149 is hereby amended by inserting after the 
words “any hospital in a nonprofessional capacity,” the following words:- any seafood packing 
or processing facility, 
SECTION 3.  Said section 56 is hereby amended by striking the following words:-  but, 
except in the work of fish processing when necessary in the judgment of the attorney general, 
and then only during the months of June, July, August, September and October, shall not exceed 
fifty-two 

of 3 11  SECTION 4. Section 60 of said chapter 149 is hereby amended by inserting after the 
words “or mechanical establishment,” the following words:- , or in any seafood packing or 
processing facility. 
SECTION 5. Section 62 of said chapter 149 is hereby amended by inserting after the 
words "(16) in any job or occupation requiring the possession or use of a firearm," the following 
words:- (17) or in any seafood packing or processing facility. 
SECTION 6. Section 78 of said chapter 149 is hereby amended by striking the figure 
“$500” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $20,000 
SECTION 7.  Said section 78 of chapter 149 is hereby amended by striking the figure 
“$5,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $100,000 
SECTION 8. Said section 78 of chapter 149 is hereby amended  by inserting at the end 
thereof the following sentence:- The penalty provided for in this section shall be in addition to 
and may be imposed concurrently with any other remedy or penalty provided for in this chapter. 
SECTION 9. Section 78A of said chapter 149 is hereby amended in subsection (a) by 
striking the figures “$250,” “$500,” and “$2,500,” respectively, and inserting in place thereof the 
following figures:- “$20,000,” “$50,000,” and “$100,000,”. 
SECTION 10. Said section 78A of chapter 149 is hereby amended by inserting at the end 
thereof the following subsection:- (e) The penalty provided for in this section shall be in addition 
to and may be imposed concurrently with any other remedy or penalty provided for in this 
chapter.  

of 3 31  SECTION 11.  Section 79 of said chapter 149 is hereby amended by striking the words 
“twenty-five nor more than two hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than two 
months, or both” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- $20,000 nor more than 
$100,000 or by imprisonment for not more than 6 months, or both